North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 17. Members of United States House of Representatives.

§ 163-201.
(See editor’s note) Congressional districts specified.

For purposes of nominating and electing members of the House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States in 2022, the State of North Carolina shall be divided into 14 districts as follows:

District 1: Bertie County, Chowan County, Edgecombe County, Franklin County, Gates County, Granville County: VTD ANTI, VTD CRDL, VTD EAOX, VTD SALM, VTD SASS, VTD SOOX, VTD WOEL: Block(s) 0779701012049, 0779701012053, 0779701012054, 0779701012055, 0779701012057,
0779701012058, 0779701012059, 0779701012060, 0779701012061, 0779701012062, 0779701012063, 0779702003000, 0779702003002; Greene County, Halifax County, Hertford County, Martin County, Nash County, Northampton County, Pasquotank
County, Perquimans County, Pitt County: VTD 101, VTD 1403A1, VTD 1403A2: Block(s) 1470013011001, 1470013011002, 1470013011003, 1470013011004, 1470013011005, 1470013011006, 1470013011007, 1470013011009, 1470013011010, 1470013011011,
1470013011012, 1470013011013, 1470013011014, 1470013011021, 1470013011022, 1470013011025, 1470013011031; VTD 1501, VTD 1503, VTD 1504A, VTD 1504B, VTD 1505A, VTD 1505B, VTD 1512A, VTD 1512B, VTD 301, VTD 401, VTD 501, VTD 701,
VTD 800A, VTD 800B, VTD 901; Vance County, Warren County, Wayne County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 017: Block(s) 1910005001023, 1910005001028, 1910005001030,
1910005001031, 1910005001032, 1910005001034, 1910005001035, 1910005001036, 1910005001037, 1910005001038, 1910005001039, 1910005001040, 1910005001041, 1910005001042, 1910005001043, 1910005001044, 1910005001045, 1910005001046,
1910005001047, 1910005001048, 1910005001049, 1910005001050, 1910005001051, 1910005001052, 1910005001054, 1910005001055, 1910005001056, 1910005001057, 1910005001058, 1910005001063, 1910014022005, 1910014022006, 1910014022007,
1910014022008, 1910014022009, 1910014022010, 1910014022011, 1910014022012, 1910015002007, 1910015002008, 1910015002009, 1910015002010, 1910015002011, 1910015002012, 1910015002022, 1910015002023, 1910015002024, 1910015002025,
1910015002026, 1910015002027, 1910015002028, 1910015002029, 1910015002030, 1910015002031, 1910015002032, 1910015002033, 1910015002034, 1910015002035, 1910020001028, 1910020001032, 1910020001033, 1910020001043, 1910020001044,
1910020001046, 1910020001047, 1910020001048, 1910020001049, 1910020001052, 1910020001053, 1910020001054, 1910020001055, 1910020001056, 1910020001057, 1910020001064, 1910020001065, 1910020001078, 1910020001079, 1910020001080,
1910020001081, 1910020001084, 1910020001089, 1910020001090, 1910020001091, 1910020001092, 1910020001093, 1910020001094, 1910020001095, 1910020001096, 1910020001097, 1910020001098, 1910020001099, 1910020001100, 1910020001101,
1910020001102, 1910020001103, 1910020001104, 1910020001105, 1910020001106, 1910020001107, 1910020001108, 1910020001109, 1910020001110, 1910020001111, 1910020001112, 1910020001113, 1910020001114, 1910020001115, 1910020001116,
1910020001117, 1910020001118, 1910020001119, 1910020001120, 1910020001121, 1910020001122, 1910020001123; VTD 018, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 1920; Wilson County.

District 2: Wake County: VTD 01-01, VTD 01-02, VTD 01-03, VTD 01-04, VTD 01-05, VTD 01-06, VTD 01-07, VTD 01-09, VTD 01-10, VTD 01-11, VTD 01-12, VTD 01-13, VTD 01-14, VTD 01-15, VTD 01-16, VTD 01-17, VTD 01-18, VTD 01-19, VTD 01-20, VTD 01-21, VTD 01-22,
VTD 01-23, VTD 01-25, VTD 01-26, VTD 01-27, VTD 01-28, VTD 01-29, VTD 01-30, VTD 01-31, VTD 01-32, VTD 01-33, VTD 01-34, VTD 01-35, VTD 01-36, VTD 01-37, VTD 01-38, VTD 01-39, VTD 01-40, VTD 01-41, VTD 01-42, VTD 01-43, VTD
01-44, VTD 01-45, VTD 01-46, VTD 01-47, VTD 01-48, VTD 01-49, VTD 01-50, VTD 01-51, VTD 02-01, VTD 02-02, VTD 02-03, VTD 02-04, VTD 02-05, VTD 02-06, VTD 04-01, VTD 04-02, VTD 04-03, VTD 04-04, VTD 04-05, VTD 04-06, VTD 04-07,
VTD 04-08, VTD 04-09, VTD 04-10, VTD 04-11, VTD 04-12, VTD 04-14, VTD 04-15, VTD 04-16, VTD 04-17, VTD 04-18, VTD 04-19, VTD 04-20, VTD 04-21, VTD 05-01, VTD 05-03, VTD 05-05, VTD 05-08: Block(s) 1830536081000, 1830536081001,
1830536081006, 1830536081021, 1830536081022, 1830536081024, 1830536081025, 1830536081026, 1830536081027, 1830536081028, 1830536081042, 1830536082000, 1830536082001, 1830536082002, 1830536082003, 1830536082004, 1830536082005,
1830536082028, 1830536082043, 1830536082044, 1830536082046, 1830536091009, 1830536091010, 1830536091011, 1830536091012, 1830536091013, 1830536091014, 1830536091015, 1830536091016, 1830536091017, 1830536091018, 1830536091019,
1830536091020, 1830536091021, 1830536091022, 1830536091023, 1830536091024, 1830536091025, 1830536091026, 1830536091027, 1830536091028, 1830536091029, 1830536091030, 1830536091031, 1830536091032, 1830536091033, 1830536091034,
1830536091035, 1830536091036, 1830536091037, 1830536091038, 1830536091039, 1830536091040, 1830536091041, 1830536091042, 1830536091043, 1830536091044, 1830536091045, 1830536091046, 1830536091047, 1830536091048, 1830536091049,
1830536091050, 1830536091051, 1830536091052, 1830536091053, 1830536091054, 1830536091055, 1830536091056, 1830536091057, 1830536091058, 1830536091059, 1830536091060, 1830536091061, 1830536091062, 1830536091063, 1830536091064,
1830536091065, 1830536091066, 1830536091067, 1830536091068, 1830536091069, 1830536091070, 1830536091071, 1830536091074, 1830536091075, 1830536091076, 1830536091081, 1830536091082, 1830536091084, 1830536091085, 1830536091087,
1830536091096, 1830536091097, 1830536091098, 1830536091099, 1830536091100, 1830536091101, 1830536091102, 1830536091103, 1830536091104, 1830536091105, 1830536091106, 1830536091107, 1830536091108, 1830536091109, 1830536091110,
1830536091111, 1830536091114, 1830536121000, 1830536121001, 1830536121002, 1830536121003, 1830536121004, 1830536121005, 1830536121006, 1830536121007, 1830536121008, 1830536121009, 1830536121010, 1830536121011, 1830536121014,
1830536121015; VTD 07-01, VTD 07-02, VTD 07-03, VTD 07-04, VTD 07-05, VTD 07-06, VTD 07-07, VTD 07-09, VTD 07-10, VTD 07-11, VTD 07-12, VTD 07-13, VTD 08-02, VTD 08-03, VTD 08-04, VTD 08-05, VTD 08-06, VTD 08-07, VTD 08-08,
VTD 08-09, VTD 08-10, VTD 08-11, VTD 09-01, VTD 09-02, VTD 09-03, VTD 10-01, VTD 10-02, VTD 10-03, VTD 10-04, VTD 11-01, VTD 11-02, VTD 13-01, VTD 13-02, VTD 13-05, VTD 13-06, VTD 13-07, VTD 13-08, VTD 13-09, VTD 13-10, VTD
13-11, VTD 14-01, VTD 14-02, VTD 17-01, VTD 17-02, VTD 17-03, VTD 17-04, VTD 17-05, VTD 17-06, VTD 17-07, VTD 17-09, VTD 17-10, VTD 17-11, VTD 17-12, VTD 17-13, VTD 18-01, VTD 18-06, VTD 18-08, VTD 19-03, VTD 19-05, VTD 19-07,
VTD 19-09, VTD 19-11, VTD 19-12, VTD 19-13, VTD 19-14, VTD 19-15, VTD 19-16, VTD 19-17, VTD 19-18, VTD 19-19, VTD 19-20, VTD 19-21.

District 3: Beaufort County, Camden County, Carteret County, Craven County, Currituck County, Dare County, Hyde County, Jones County, Lenoir County, Onslow County, Pamlico County, Pender County, Pitt County: VTD 1001, VTD 1101, VTD 1102A, VTD 1102B, VTD
1201, VTD 1301, VTD 1403A2: Block(s) 1470012003018, 1470013011000, 1470013011008, 1470013011015, 1470013011016, 1470013011017, 1470013011018, 1470013011019, 1470013011020, 1470013011023, 1470013011024, 1470013011026, 1470013011027,
1470013011028, 1470013011029, 1470013011030, 1470013012050, 1470013012051, 1470013012052, 1470013012053, 1470013012054, 1470013012055, 1470013012056, 1470013012057, 1470013012058, 1470013012059, 1470013012060, 1470013012061,
1470013012062, 1470013012063, 1470013012064, 1470013021000, 1470013021001, 1470013021002, 1470013021003, 1470013021004, 1470013021005, 1470013021006, 1470013021007, 1470013021008, 1470013021009, 1470013021010, 1470013021011,
1470013021012, 1470013021013, 1470013021014, 1470013021015, 1470013021016, 1470013021017, 1470013021018, 1470013021019, 1470013021020, 1470013021021, 1470013021022, 1470013021023, 1470013021024, 1470013021025, 1470013021026,
1470013021027, 1470013021028, 1470013021029, 1470013021030, 1470013021031, 1470013021032, 1470013021033, 1470013021034, 1470013021035, 1470013021036, 1470013021037, 1470013021038, 1470013021039, 1470013021040, 1470013021041,
1470013021042, 1470013021043, 1470013021044, 1470013023012, 1470013042031, 1470013042032, 1470013042035, 1470013042036, 1470013042037, 1470013042038, 1470013042043, 1470014021000, 1470014021001, 1470014021002, 1470014021003,
1470014021004, 1470014021005, 1470014021031, 1470014021033, 1470014033000, 1470014033001, 1470014033002; VTD 1403B, VTD 1506, VTD 1507, VTD 1507B, VTD 1508A, VTD 1508B, VTD 1509, VTD 1510A, VTD 1510B, VTD 1511A, VTD 1511B,
VTD 1513A, VTD 1513B, VTD 200A, VTD 200B, VTD 601; Tyrrell County, Washington County.

District 4: Alamance County: VTD 002, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 007, VTD 011, VTD 013, VTD 035, VTD 03C, VTD 03N, VTD 03S, VTD 03W, VTD 063, VTD 064, VTD 06E, VTD 06N, VTD 06S, VTD 06W, VTD 08N, VTD 08S: Block(s) 0010218032003, 0010219021018, 0010219023005,
0010219023006, 0010219023009, 0010219023010; VTD 09N, VTD 09S, VTD 103, VTD 10N, VTD 10S, VTD 1210, VTD 124, VTD 125, VTD 126, VTD 127, VTD 128, VTD 129, VTD 12E, VTD 12N, VTD 12S, VTD 12W, VTD 3N2; Caswell County, Durham County,
Granville County: VTD BERE, VTD BTNR, VTD CORI, VTD CRDM, VTD MTEN, VTD OKHL, VTD TYHO, VTD WILT, VTD WOEL: Block(s) 0779701012048, 0779701012064, 0779701012065, 0779701021016, 0779701021017, 0779701021018, 0779701021020, 0779701021021,
0779701021022, 0779701021023, 0779701021024, 0779701021034, 0779701021039, 0779701021040, 0779701021041, 0779701021057, 0779702003001, 0779702003003, 0779702003004, 0779702003005, 0779702003006, 0779702003007, 0779702003008,
0779702003009, 0779702003010, 0779702003011, 0779702003012, 0779702003013, 0779702003014, 0779702003015, 0779702003016, 0779702003017, 0779702003018, 0779702003019, 0779702003020, 0779702003021, 0779703001005, 0779703001007,
0779703001008, 0779703001033, 0779703003000, 0779703003001, 0779703003003, 0779703003004, 0779703003012; Orange County, Person County.

District 5: Alleghany County, Ashe County, Forsyth County, Rockingham County: VTD DR, VTD EC, VTD EDEN-1, VTD HO, VTD HU, VTD IR: Block(s) 1570415011008, 1570415011009, 1570415011010, 1570415011011, 1570415011012, 1570415011029, 1570415011030, 1570415011031,
1570415011032, 1570416011044, 1570416011047, 1570416011048, 1570416011049, 1570416011050, 1570416011051, 1570416011059, 1570416021005, 1570416021006, 1570416021007, 1570416021008, 1570416021009, 1570416021010, 1570416021011,
1570416021012, 1570416021013, 1570416021014, 1570416021015, 1570416021016, 1570416021017, 1570416021018, 1570416021019, 1570416021020, 1570416021021, 1570416021022, 1570416021023, 1570416021024, 1570416021025, 1570416021026,
1570416021027, 1570416021028, 1570416021029, 1570416021030, 1570416021031, 1570416021032, 1570416021033, 1570416022021, 1570416022022, 1570416022023, 1570416022024, 1570416022037, 1570416022038, 1570416023000, 1570416023006;
VTD LI, VTD LK-2, VTD MA, VTD MC, VTD MS, VTD NB, VTD RC, VTD WS; Stokes County, Surry County, Watauga County, Wilkes County, Yadkin County: VTD NKNB, VTD SKNB: Block(s) 1970503006004, 1970503006007, 1970503006008, 1970503006017,
1970503006018, 1970503006019, 1970503006020, 1970503006021, 1970503006022, 1970503006023, 1970503006024, 1970503006027, 1970503006028, 1970503006029, 1970503006030, 1970503006031, 1970503006032, 1970503006033, 1970503006034,
1970503006035, 1970503006036, 1970503006037, 1970503006038, 1970503006039, 1970503006040, 1970503006041, 1970503006042, 1970503006043.

District 6: Alamance County: VTD 001, VTD 08S: Block(s) 0010218032002, 0010218032014, 0010218032015, 0010218032016, 0010218032017, 0010218032018, 0010218032019, 0010218032020, 0010218032021, 0010218032023, 0010218032024, 0010218032025, 0010218032026,
0010218032027, 0010218032028, 0010218032035, 0010218032036, 0010219022013, 0010219022015, 0010219023000, 0010219023001, 0010219023003, 0010219023004, 0010219023007, 0010219023008, 0010219023011, 0010219023012, 0010219023013,
0010219023014, 0010219023015, 0010219023016, 0010219023017, 0010219023018, 0010219023019, 0010219023020, 0010219023021, 0010219023022, 0010219023023, 0010219023024, 0010219023025, 0010219023026, 0010219023027, 0010219023028,
0010219023029, 0010219023030, 0010219023031, 0010219023032, 0010219023033, 0010219023034, 0010219023035, 0010219023036, 0010219023037, 0010219023038, 0010219023039, 0010219023040, 0010219023041, 0010219023042, 0010219023043;
Chatham County, Guilford County: VTD CG1, VTD CG2, VTD CG3A, VTD CG3B, VTD FEN1, VTD FEN2, VTD G01, VTD G02, VTD G03, VTD G04, VTD G05, VTD G06, VTD G07, VTD G08, VTD G09, VTD G10, VTD G11, VTD G12, VTD G13, VTD G14, VTD G15,
VTD G16, VTD G17, VTD G18, VTD G19, VTD G20, VTD G21, VTD G22, VTD G23, VTD G24, VTD G25, VTD G26, VTD G27, VTD G28, VTD G29, VTD G30, VTD G31, VTD G32, VTD G33, VTD G34, VTD G35, VTD G36, VTD G37, VTD G38, VTD G39, VTD G40B,
VTD G44, VTD G45, VTD G46, VTD G47, VTD G48, VTD G49, VTD G50, VTD G51, VTD G52, VTD G53, VTD G54, VTD G55, VTD G56, VTD G57, VTD G58, VTD G59, VTD G60, VTD G63, VTD G67, VTD G68, VTD G69, VTD G70, VTD G71, VTD G72, VTD G73,
VTD G74, VTD G75, VTD GIB, VTD GR, VTD JEF1, VTD JEF2, VTD JEF3, VTD JEF4, VTD MON1, VTD MON2A: Block(s) 0810119053010, 0810119053017, 0810119053018, 0810155001000, 0810155001001, 0810155001002, 0810155001003, 0810155001004,
0810155001005, 0810155001006, 0810155001007, 0810155001008, 0810155001009, 0810155001010, 0810155001011, 0810155001012, 0810155001013, 0810155001014, 0810155001015, 0810155001016, 0810155001017, 0810155001018, 0810155001019,
0810155001020, 0810155001021, 0810155001024, 0810155001025, 0810155001026, 0810155001027, 0810155001028, 0810155001029, 0810155001030, 0810155001031, 0810155001032, 0810155001033, 0810155001034, 0810155001036, 0810155001038,
0810155001039, 0810155001040, 0810155001041, 0810155001044, 0810155001045, 0810155001046, 0810155001047, 0810155001048, 0810155001049, 0810155002000, 0810155002001, 0810155002002, 0810155002005, 0810155003001, 0810155003003,
0810155003004, 0810155003005, 0810155003011, 0810155003012, 0810155003013, 0810155003014, 0810155003015, 0810155003016, 0810155003018, 0810155003019, 0810155003020, 0810155003021, 0810155003022, 0810155003034, 0810155003035,
0810155003037, 0810155003038, 0810155003039, 0810155003041, 0810155003042, 0810155003043, 0810155003044, 0810155003045, 0810155003050, 0810155003052, 0810155003054, 0810155003056, 0810155003058, 0810155003061, 0810157062030,
0810157062031; VTD MON2B, VTD NCLAY1, VTD NCLAY2, VTD NMAD, VTD NWASH, VTD PG1, VTD PG2, VTD RC1, VTD RC2, VTD SCLAY, VTD SMAD, VTD SUM1, VTD SUM2, VTD SUM3, VTD SUM4, VTD SWASH; Harnett County, Lee County, Randolph County,
Rockingham County: VTD IR: Block(s) 1570416011045, 1570416011058, 1570416021002, 1570416021003, 1570416022000, 1570416022001, 1570416022002, 1570416022003, 1570416022004, 1570416022005, 1570416022006, 1570416022007, 1570416022008,
1570416022009, 1570416022010, 1570416022011, 1570416022012, 1570416022013, 1570416022014, 1570416022015, 1570416022016, 1570416022017, 1570416022018, 1570416022019, 1570416022020, 1570416022025, 1570416022026, 1570416022027,
1570416022028, 1570416022029, 1570416022030, 1570416022031, 1570416022032, 1570416022033, 1570416022034, 1570416022035, 1570416022036, 1570416022039, 1570416022040, 1570416022041; VTD SE.

District 7: Bladen County, Brunswick County, Columbus County: VTD P01A, VTD P02B, VTD P14, VTD P16B, VTD P17, VTD P19, VTD P20A, VTD P23: Block(s) 0479307003000, 0479307003001, 0479307003002, 0479307003003, 0479307003004, 0479307003007, 0479307003016,
0479307003017, 0479307003018, 0479307003019, 0479307003020, 0479307003033, 0479307003035, 0479307003036, 0479307003037, 0479307003038, 0479307003039, 0479307003042, 0479308002000, 0479308002001, 0479308002002, 0479308002003,
0479308002004, 0479308002005, 0479308002006, 0479308002007, 0479308002008, 0479308002009, 0479308002010, 0479308002016, 0479308003002, 0479308003003, 0479308003004, 0479308003005, 0479308003006, 0479308003007, 0479308003008,
0479308003009, 0479308003010, 0479308003011, 0479308003012, 0479308003013, 0479308003035, 0479308003036, 0479308003038, 0479308004002, 0479308004004, 0479308004005, 0479308004006, 0479308004007, 0479308004008, 0479308004009,
0479308004010, 0479308004011, 0479308004012, 0479308004013, 0479308004014, 0479308004015, 0479309001001, 0479309001002, 0479309001003, 0479309001004, 0479309001005, 0479309001006, 0479309001007, 0479309001008, 0479309001009,
0479309001010, 0479309001011, 0479309001012, 0479309001013, 0479309001014, 0479309001015, 0479309001016, 0479309001017, 0479309001018, 0479309001019, 0479309001020, 0479309001021, 0479309001022, 0479309001023, 0479309001024,
0479309001025, 0479309001029, 0479309001030, 0479309001031, 0479309001032, 0479309002009, 0479309002010, 0479309002023, 0479309002024, 0479309002025, 0479309004011; Cumberland County, New Hanover County.

District 8: Cabarrus County, Davidson County: VTD 004, VTD 006, VTD 008, VTD 010, VTD 016, VTD 020, VTD 022, VTD 024, VTD 026, VTD 028, VTD 030, VTD 032, VTD 034, VTD 036, VTD 038, VTD 040, VTD 042, VTD 044, VTD 046, VTD 048, VTD 050, VTD 052: Block(s)
0570615023024, 0570615023025, 0570615023026, 0570618051003, 0570618051004, 0570618051005, 0570618051006, 0570618051007, 0570618051011, 0570618051012, 0570618051013, 0570618051014, 0570618051015, 0570618051016, 0570618051018,
0570618052000, 0570618052001, 0570618052002, 0570618052004, 0570618052007, 0570618052008, 0570618052015, 0570618052016, 0570618052017, 0570618052022, 0570618052023, 0570618063000, 0570618063001, 0570618063002, 0570618063005,
0570618063010, 0570619021030, 0570619021035, 0570619022004, 0570619022005, 0570619022006; VTD 060, VTD 062, VTD 064, VTD 066, VTD 068, VTD 070, VTD 072, VTD 074, VTD 076, VTD 078, VTD 082, VTD 084, VTD 088, VTD 80A, VTD 86A;
Guilford County: VTD FR1, VTD FR2, VTD FR3, VTD FR4, VTD FR5A, VTD FR5B, VTD G40A1, VTD G40A2, VTD G41A, VTD G41B, VTD G42A, VTD G42B, VTD G43, VTD G61, VTD G62, VTD G64, VTD G65, VTD G66, VTD H01, VTD H02, VTD H03, VTD H04,
VTD H05, VTD H06, VTD H07, VTD H08, VTD H09, VTD H10, VTD H11, VTD H12, VTD H13, VTD H14, VTD H15, VTD H16, VTD H17, VTD H18, VTD H19A, VTD H19B, VTD H20A, VTD H20B, VTD H21, VTD H22, VTD H23, VTD H24, VTD H25, VTD H26, VTD
H27-A, VTD H27-B, VTD H28, VTD H29A, VTD H29B, VTD JAM1, VTD JAM2, VTD JAM3, VTD JAM4, VTD JAM5, VTD MON2A: Block(s) 0810155003000, 0810155003002, 0810155003006, 0810155003007, 0810155003017, 0810155003023, 0810155003059, 0810157062011,
0810157062012; VTD MON3, VTD NCGR1, VTD NCGR2, VTD NDRI, VTD OR1, VTD OR2, VTD SDRI, VTD SF1, VTD SF2, VTD SF3, VTD SF4, VTD STOK; Rowan County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 007: Block(s) 1590519011009, 1590519011010,
1590519011011, 1590519011012, 1590519011013, 1590519011014, 1590519011015, 1590519011016, 1590519011017, 1590519011018, 1590519011019, 1590519011020, 1590519011021, 1590519011022, 1590519011024, 1590519011025, 1590519011026,
1590519011027, 1590519012000, 1590519012001, 1590519012002, 1590519012003, 1590519012004, 1590519012005, 1590519012006, 1590519012007, 1590519012008, 1590519012009, 1590519012010, 1590519012011, 1590519012012, 1590519012013,
1590519012014, 1590519012015, 1590519012016, 1590519012017, 1590519012018, 1590519012019, 1590519012020, 1590519012021, 1590519012022, 1590519031010, 1590519031011, 1590519031012, 1590519031021, 1590519031022, 1590519031023,
1590519031024, 1590519031025, 1590519031026, 1590519031027, 1590519031033, 1590519031038, 1590519032041, 1590519032042, 1590519032058, 1590519041044, 1590519042002, 1590519042003, 1590519042004, 1590519042005, 1590519042006,
1590519042015, 1590519042016, 1590519042017, 1590519042018, 1590519042019, 1590519042020, 1590519042021, 1590519042022, 1590519042023, 1590519042024, 1590519042025, 1590519042026, 1590519042028, 1590519042029, 1590519042030,
1590519042031, 1590519042032, 1590519042033, 1590519042034, 1590519042035, 1590519042036, 1590519042037, 1590519042038, 1590519042039, 1590519042040, 1590519042041, 1590519042042, 1590519042043, 1590519042044; VTD 008, VTD
009, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 018, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 038, VTD
039, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 044, VTD 045, VTD 05A, VTD 14A, VTD 19A.

District 9: Anson County, Columbus County: VTD P03, VTD P04, VTD P05, VTD P06, VTD P07, VTD P08, VTD P09, VTD P10, VTD P11, VTD P12, VTD P13, VTD P15, VTD P18, VTD P21, VTD P22A, VTD P23: Block(s) 0479307003015, 0479307003034, 0479307003040, 0479307003041;
VTD P24, VTD P25B, VTD P26B; Davidson County: VTD 012, VTD 014, VTD 018, VTD 052: Block(s) 0570618051008, 0570618051017, 0570618052003, 0570618052005, 0570618052006, 0570618052009, 0570618052010, 0570618052011, 0570618052012,
0570618052013, 0570618052014, 0570618052018, 0570618052019, 0570618052020, 0570618052021, 0570618061000, 0570618061001, 0570618061002, 0570618061003, 0570618061004, 0570618061005, 0570618061006, 0570618061007, 0570618061008,
0570618061009, 0570618061010, 0570618061011, 0570618061012, 0570618061013, 0570618061014, 0570618061015, 0570618061016, 0570618061017, 0570618062000, 0570618062001, 0570618062002, 0570618062003, 0570618062004, 0570618062005,
0570618062006, 0570618062007, 0570618062008, 0570618062009, 0570618062010, 0570618062011, 0570618062012, 0570618062013, 0570618062014, 0570618062015, 0570618063003, 0570618063004, 0570618063006, 0570618063007, 0570618063008,
0570618063009, 0570618063011, 0570618063012, 0570618063013, 0570618063014, 0570618063015, 0570618063016, 0570618063017, 0570618063019, 0570618063020, 0570618063022, 0570619022028, 0570619022029, 0570619022040, 0570619022041,
0570619022055, 0570619022056, 0570619022059, 0570619022060, 0570620011001, 0570620011004, 0570620011005, 0570620011006, 0570620011014; VTD 054, VTD 056, VTD 058; Hoke County, Montgomery County, Moore County, Richmond County,
Robeson County, Scotland County, Stanly County, Union County.

District 10: Alexander County, Avery County, Burke County, Caldwell County, Catawba County, Davie County, Iredell County, Lincoln County, McDowell County: VTD MAR-1: Block(s) 1119701022000, 1119701022001, 1119701022007, 1119701022008, 1119701022009, 1119701022013,
1119701022014, 1119701022015, 1119701022016, 1119701022017, 1119701022018, 1119701022019, 1119701022020, 1119701022021, 1119701022022, 1119701022023, 1119701022024, 1119701022025, 1119701022026, 1119701022027, 1119701022028,
1119701022029, 1119701022030, 1119701022031, 1119701022032, 1119701022033, 1119701022034, 1119701022035, 1119701022049, 1119701022050, 1119701022051, 1119701022052, 1119701022053, 1119701022054, 1119701022055, 1119701022056,
1119701022057, 1119701022058, 1119701022059, 1119701022060, 1119701022061, 1119701022062, 1119701022063, 1119701022064, 1119701022065, 1119701022066, 1119701022067, 1119701022068, 1119701022069, 1119701022070, 1119701022071,
1119701022072, 1119701022073, 1119701022074, 1119701022075, 1119701022076, 1119701022077, 1119701022078, 1119701022079, 1119701022080, 1119701022081, 1119701022082, 1119701022083, 1119701022084, 1119701022085, 1119701022086,
1119703001003, 1119703001004, 1119703001006, 1119703001007, 1119703001008, 1119703001036, 1119703002000, 1119703002001, 1119703002002, 1119703002003, 1119703002004, 1119703002005, 1119703002006, 1119703002007, 1119703002008,
1119703002009, 1119703002010, 1119703002011, 1119703002012, 1119703002013, 1119703002014, 1119703002015, 1119703002016, 1119703002017, 1119703002018, 1119703002019, 1119703002020, 1119703002021, 1119703002022, 1119703002023,
1119703002024, 1119703002025, 1119703002026, 1119703002027, 1119703002028, 1119703002029, 1119703003000, 1119703003001, 1119703003002, 1119703003003, 1119703003004, 1119703003005, 1119703003006, 1119703003007, 1119703003008,
1119703003009, 1119703003010, 1119703003011, 1119703003012, 1119703003013, 1119703003014, 1119703003015, 1119703003016, 1119703003017, 1119703003018, 1119704002000, 1119704002001, 1119704002011, 1119706001000, 1119706001001;
VTD MAR-3, VTD MAR-4: Block(s) 1119702002004, 1119702002005, 1119702002007, 1119702002008, 1119702002027, 1119704001004, 1119704001006; VTD N.COVE, VTD NEBO, VTD T.COVE; Rowan County: VTD 007: Block(s) 1590519041028, 1590519041029,
1590519041030, 1590519041035, 1590519041036, 1590519041037, 1590519041038, 1590519041039, 1590519041040, 1590519041041, 1590519041042, 1590519041043, 1590519041045, 1590519041046, 1590519042001, 1590519042007, 1590519042008,
1590519042009, 1590519042010, 1590519042011, 1590519042012, 1590519042013, 1590519042014, 1590519042027; VTD 027; Yadkin County: VTD BNVL, VTD DCRK, VTD EBND, VTD FBSH, VTD NBCK, VTD NFAL, VTD NLIB, VTD SBCK, VTD SFAL, VTD
SKNB: Block(s) 1970502002029, 1970502002030, 1970502002035, 1970502002036, 1970503006005, 1970503006009, 1970503006010, 1970503006011, 1970503006012, 1970503006013, 1970503006014, 1970503006015, 1970503006016, 1970503006026,
1970504011000, 1970504011001, 1970504011002, 1970504011003, 1970504011004, 1970504011005, 1970504011017, 1970504011018; VTD SLIB.

District 11: Buncombe County, Cherokee County, Clay County, Graham County, Haywood County, Henderson County, Jackson County, Macon County, Madison County, McDowell County: VTD CCREEK, VTD DYSART, VTD FORT-1, VTD FORT-2, VTD GLENWD, VTD HIGGIN, VTD M.COVE,
VTD MAR-1: Block(s) 1119704002018, 1119704002019; VTD MAR-2, VTD MAR-4: Block(s) 1119702002003, 1119702002018, 1119702002019, 1119702002021, 1119702002022, 1119702002023, 1119702002025, 1119702002026, 1119704001000, 1119704001001,
1119704001002, 1119704001003, 1119704001005, 1119704001007, 1119704001008, 1119704001009, 1119704001010, 1119704001011, 1119704001012, 1119704001013, 1119704001014, 1119704001015, 1119704001016, 1119704001017, 1119704001018,
1119704001019, 1119704001020, 1119704001021, 1119704001022, 1119704001025, 1119704001026, 1119704001027, 1119704001028, 1119704001029, 1119704001030, 1119704001031, 1119704001032, 1119704001033, 1119704001034, 1119704001035,
1119704001036, 1119704001037, 1119704001038, 1119704001040, 1119704001041, 1119704001042, 1119704001043, 1119704001044, 1119704001045, 1119704001046, 1119704001047, 1119704001048, 1119705001016, 1119705001017, 1119705001018,
1119705001019, 1119705001020, 1119705001021, 1119705001022, 1119705001023, 1119705001024, 1119705001025, 1119705001026, 1119705001027, 1119705001028, 1119705001029, 1119705001030, 1119705001031, 1119705001032, 1119705001033,
1119705001034, 1119705001048, 1119705001049, 1119705001050, 1119705001051, 1119705001052, 1119705001053; VTD MAR-5, VTD PLEASA, VTD WEST-M; Mitchell County, Polk County, Rutherford County: VTD 018, VTD 027, VTD 028: Block(s)
1619605021001, 1619605021002, 1619605021003, 1619605021004, 1619605021005, 1619605021006, 1619605021007, 1619605021008, 1619605021009, 1619605021011, 1619605021012, 1619605021014, 1619605021016, 1619605021017, 1619605021018,
1619605021019, 1619605021020, 1619605021021, 1619605021022, 1619605021023, 1619605021024, 1619605021025, 1619605021026, 1619605021027, 1619605021028, 1619605021030, 1619605021031, 1619605021033, 1619605021034, 1619605021043,
1619605021044, 1619605022000, 1619605022001, 1619605022002, 1619605022003, 1619605022004, 1619605022005, 1619605022006, 1619605022007, 1619605022008, 1619605022009, 1619605022010, 1619605022011, 1619605022012, 1619605022013,
1619605022014, 1619605022015, 1619605022016, 1619605022017, 1619605022018, 1619605022019, 1619605022020, 1619605022021, 1619605022022, 1619605022023, 1619605022024, 1619605022025, 1619605022026, 1619605022027, 1619605022028,
1619605022029, 1619605022030, 1619605022031, 1619605022032, 1619605022033, 1619605022034, 1619605022035, 1619605022036, 1619605022037, 1619605032000, 1619605032001, 1619605032002, 1619605032003, 1619605032004, 1619605032005,
1619605032007, 1619605032009, 1619605032010, 1619605032011, 1619605032012, 1619605032013, 1619605032014, 1619605032015, 1619605032017, 1619605032026, 1619605032027, 1619606001000, 1619606001001, 1619606001002, 1619606001003,
1619606001004, 1619606001005, 1619606001006, 1619606001014, 1619606001019, 1619606001024, 1619606001025, 1619606001028, 1619606001030, 1619606001031, 1619606001041, 1619606001072, 1619606001073, 1619606001075, 1619606001076,
1619606001077, 1619606002022, 1619606002023, 1619606003002, 1619606003003; VTD 06A, VTD 16A; Swain County, Transylvania County, Yancey County.

District 12: Mecklenburg County: VTD 002: Block(s) 1190024001000, 1190024001001, 1190024001002, 1190024001003, 1190024001004, 1190024001005, 1190024001006, 1190024001007, 1190024001008, 1190024001009, 1190024001010, 1190024001012, 1190024001013, 1190024001014,
1190024001015, 1190024001016, 1190024001017, 1190024001018, 1190024002000, 1190024002001, 1190024002002, 1190024002003, 1190024002004, 1190024002005, 1190024002006, 1190024002007, 1190024002008, 1190024002009, 1190024002010,
1190024003000, 1190024003001, 1190024003002, 1190024003003, 1190024003004, 1190024003012, 1190024003018, 1190024003019, 1190025001010, 1190025001011, 1190025001012, 1190025001013, 1190025001014, 1190025001015, 1190025001016,
1190025001017, 1190025002017, 1190025002021, 1190025002022, 1190025002023, 1190025002024, 1190025002025, 1190025002027, 1190025002028, 1190026001000, 1190026001001, 1190026001002, 1190026001005, 1190026001006, 1190026001007,
1190026001008, 1190026001011, 1190026001012, 1190026001013; VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD
033, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 043, VTD 044, VTD 045, VTD 046, VTD 047, VTD 054, VTD 055, VTD 056, VTD 060, VTD 061, VTD 062, VTD 063, VTD 064, VTD 065, VTD 066, VTD 067, VTD 068, VTD 082, VTD 083, VTD
084, VTD 085, VTD 089, VTD 090, VTD 091, VTD 094, VTD 095, VTD 096, VTD 099, VTD 100, VTD 102, VTD 103, VTD 104, VTD 105, VTD 106, VTD 107.1, VTD 108, VTD 109, VTD 112, VTD 113, VTD 115, VTD 116, VTD 117, VTD 118, VTD 121,
VTD 123, VTD 124, VTD 125, VTD 126, VTD 127, VTD 128, VTD 130, VTD 131, VTD 132, VTD 133, VTD 134, VTD 135, VTD 136, VTD 137, VTD 141, VTD 142, VTD 143, VTD 145, VTD 146, VTD 149, VTD 150, VTD 151, VTD 201, VTD 202, VTD 203,
VTD 204.1, VTD 205, VTD 206, VTD 207, VTD 208, VTD 209, VTD 210, VTD 211, VTD 212, VTD 213, VTD 214, VTD 215, VTD 216, VTD 217, VTD 218, VTD 219, VTD 220, VTD 221, VTD 222, VTD 223.1, VTD 227, VTD 233, VTD 234, VTD 235, VTD
236, VTD 237, VTD 238.1, VTD 239, VTD 240, VTD 241, VTD 242.

District 13: Duplin County, Johnston County, Sampson County, Wake County: VTD 03-00, VTD 04-13, VTD 05-06, VTD 05-07, VTD 05-08: Block(s) 1830536081002, 1830536081003, 1830536081004, 1830536081005, 1830536081007, 1830536081008, 1830536081009, 1830536081010,
1830536081011, 1830536081012, 1830536081013, 1830536081014, 1830536081015, 1830536081016, 1830536081017, 1830536081018, 1830536081019, 1830536081020, 1830536081023, 1830536081029, 1830536081030, 1830536081031, 1830536081032,
1830536081033, 1830536081034, 1830536081035, 1830536081036, 1830536081037, 1830536081038, 1830536081039, 1830536081040, 1830536081041, 1830536082006, 1830536082007, 1830536082008, 1830536082009, 1830536082010, 1830536082011,
1830536082012, 1830536082013, 1830536082014, 1830536082015, 1830536082016, 1830536082017, 1830536082018, 1830536082019, 1830536082020, 1830536082021, 1830536082022, 1830536082023, 1830536082024, 1830536082025, 1830536082026,
1830536082027, 1830536082029, 1830536082030, 1830536082031, 1830536082032, 1830536082033, 1830536082034, 1830536082035, 1830536082036, 1830536082037, 1830536082038, 1830536082039, 1830536082040, 1830536082041, 1830536082042,
1830536082045, 1830536082047, 1830536082048, 1830536082049; VTD 06-04, VTD 06-05, VTD 06-06, VTD 06-07, VTD 06-08, VTD 06-09, VTD 06-10, VTD 12-01, VTD 12-02, VTD 12-04, VTD 12-05, VTD 12-06, VTD 12-07, VTD 12-08, VTD 12-09,
VTD 15-01, VTD 15-02, VTD 15-03, VTD 15-04, VTD 16-01, VTD 16-02, VTD 16-03, VTD 16-04, VTD 16-05, VTD 16-06, VTD 16-07, VTD 16-09, VTD 16-10, VTD 16-11, VTD 18-02, VTD 18-03, VTD 18-04, VTD 18-05, VTD 18-07, VTD 20-01, VTD
20-03, VTD 20-04, VTD 20-05, VTD 20-06A, VTD 20-06B, VTD 20-08, VTD 20-09, VTD 20-10, VTD 20-11, VTD 20-12, VTD 20-14, VTD 20-15, VTD 20-16, VTD 20-17; Wayne County: VTD 003, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 016, VTD 017: Block(s)
1910020001003, 1910020001004, 1910020001005, 1910020001006, 1910020001007, 1910020001008, 1910020001009, 1910020001010, 1910020001011, 1910020001012, 1910020001013, 1910020001014, 1910020001015, 1910020001016, 1910020001017,
1910020001018, 1910020001019, 1910020001020, 1910020001021, 1910020001022, 1910020001023, 1910020001024, 1910020001029, 1910020001030, 1910020001031, 1910020001034, 1910020001035, 1910020001045, 1910020001050, 1910020001051,
1910020001066, 1910020001067, 1910020001068, 1910020001069, 1910020001070, 1910020001071, 1910020001072, 1910020001073, 1910020001074, 1910020001075, 1910020001076, 1910020001077, 1910020001082, 1910020001083, 1910020001085,
1910020001086, 1910020001087, 1910020001088; VTD 024, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 2530.

District 14: Cleveland County, Gaston County, Mecklenburg County: VTD 001, VTD 002: Block(s) 1190024003011, 1190026001003, 1190026001004, 1190026001009, 1190026001010, 1190026001014, 1190026001015, 1190026001016, 1190026001017, 1190026001018, 1190026001019,
1190026001020, 1190026001021, 1190026001022, 1190026001023, 1190026001024, 1190026001025, 1190026001026, 1190026001027, 1190026001028, 1190026001030, 1190026001031, 1190026001032; VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 018, VTD 019,
VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 037, VTD 038, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 048, VTD 049, VTD 050, VTD 051, VTD 052, VTD 053, VTD 057, VTD 058, VTD 059, VTD 069, VTD 070, VTD 071, VTD 072, VTD 073,
VTD 074, VTD 075, VTD 076, VTD 077, VTD 079, VTD 080, VTD 081, VTD 086, VTD 087, VTD 088, VTD 092, VTD 093, VTD 097, VTD 098, VTD 101, VTD 110, VTD 111, VTD 114, VTD 119, VTD 120, VTD 122, VTD 129, VTD 138, VTD 139.1, VTD 140,
VTD 144, VTD 147, VTD 148, VTD 200, VTD 224, VTD 225, VTD 226, VTD 228, VTD 229, VTD 230, VTD 231, VTD 232, VTD 243, VTD 78.1; Rutherford County: VTD 011, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 019, VTD 028: Block(s) 1619605021032, 1619606003000,
1619606003001, 1619606003004, 1619607004003; VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD 034, VTD 03A, VTD 04A, VTD 05A, VTD 09A, VTD 10A.

The names and boundaries of voting tabulation districts, tracts, block groups, and blocks specified in this section are as shown on the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

If any voting tabulation district boundary is changed, that change shall not change the boundary of a congressional district, which shall remain the same as it is depicted by the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

The Legislative Services Officer shall certify a true copy of the block assignment file associated with any mapping software used to generate the language in subsection (a) of this section. The certified true copy of the block assignment file shall be
delivered by the Legislative Services Officer to the Principal Clerk of the Senate and the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives. If any area within North Carolina is not assigned to a specific district by subsection
(a) of this section, the certified true copy of the block assignment file delivered to the Principal Clerk of the Senate and the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives shall control.

History.
Rev., s. 4366; 1911, c. 97; C.S., s. 6004; 1931, c. 216; 1941, c. 3; 1961, c. 864; 1966, Ex. Sess., c. 7, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 1109; 1971, c. 257; 1981, c. 894; 1982, Ex. Sess., c. 7; 1991, c. 601, s. 1; c. 761,
s. 33(a), (b); 1991, Ex. Sess., c. 7, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 66; 1997-11, ss. 1, 2; 1997-456, ss. 27, 52; 1998-2, ss. 1, 1.1; 2001-471, s. 1; 2001-479, ss. 1, 2; 2011-403, s. 1; 2011-414, s. 2; 2016-1, Ex. Sess., s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3.1(a),
(b); 2019-249, s. 1; 2021-174, s. 1; 2022-3, s. 1.

§ 163-201.1.
Severability of congressional apportionment acts.

If any provision of any act of the General Assembly that apportions congressional districts is held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions that can be given effect without the invalid provision;
and to this end the provisions of any said act are severable.

History.
1981, c. 771, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-201.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by G.S. 120-30.9J, as enacted by Session Laws 2013-343, s. 1, effective July 23, 2013.

History.
1995, c. 355, s. 2; repealed by G.S. 120-30.9J, as enacted by Session Laws 2013-343, s. 1, effective July 23, 2013.

§ 163-202.
Election after reapportionment of members of House of Representatives.

Whenever, by a new apportionment of members of the United States House of Representatives, the number of Representatives from North Carolina shall be changed, and neither the Congress nor the General Assembly shall provide for electing them, the following
procedures shall apply:

If the number of Representatives is increased, the Representative from each of the existing congressional districts shall be elected by the qualified voters of his district, and the additional Representatives apportioned to North Carolina shall be elected
on a single ballot by the qualified voters of the whole State.

If the number of Representatives is decreased, existing congressional district lines shall be ignored, and all Representatives apportioned to North Carolina shall be elected on a single ballot by the qualified voters of the whole State.

History.
1901, c. 89, s. 58; Rev., s. 4368; C.S., s. 6006; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-203 through 163-207.

Reserved for future codification purposes.